Illinois, session 104th, SB717.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Continuum of Care Services for the 5Developmentally Disabled Act is amended by changing Section 1 6as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 42/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Continuum of Care Services for the Developmentally Disabled 10Act.11(Source: P.A. 99-892, eff. 1-1-17.)